public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A r va/JPR [aeinu]kir
SFX A r va/JPR [aeio]strar
SFX A r va/JPR [aeiop]letar
SFX A r va/JPR [aeiou]nir
SFX A r va/JPR [aeiou]xenar
SFX A r va/JPR [aeiru]ñar
SFX A r va/JPR [aeiu]bir
SFX A r va/JPR [aeiu]ngar
SFX A r va/JPR [aeiu]ŧiar
SFX A r va/JPR [aelo]var
SFX A r va/JPR [aenoux]golar
SFX A r va/JPR [aeo]liar
SFX A r va/JPR [aeors]tiđar
SFX A r va/JPR [aeou]mentar
SFX A r va/JPR [agot]rejar
SFX A r va/JPR [ai]erar
SFX A r va/JPR [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A r va/JPR [ail]gar
SFX A r va/JPR [ailnou]sar
SFX A r va/JPR [ailnu]bar
SFX A r va/JPR [ailu]minar
SFX A r va/JPR [aiou]rmar
SFX A r va/JPR [aiou]ñir
SFX A r va/JPR [aisu]kiar
SFX A r va/JPR [aku]rifegar
SFX A r va/JPR [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A r va/JPR [als]tar
SFX A r va/JPR [an]deđar
SFX A r va/JPR [an]fraxar
SFX A r va/JPR [an]kuerar
SFX A r va/JPR [an]kuirar
SFX A r va/JPR [ano]fegar
SFX A r va/JPR [anou]pir
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]er
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]ler
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]niđar
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]rcar
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]rdar
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]rdir
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]rdonar
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]rkar
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]rnar
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]rnir
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]rsar
SFX A r va/JPR [ao]rtir
SFX A r va/JPR [aou]nŧiar
SFX A r va/JPR [aou]rbar
SFX A r va/JPR [aou]rbir
SFX A r va/JPR [aou]rgar
SFX A r va/JPR [aou]rkiar
SFX A r va/JPR [aou]rlar
SFX A r va/JPR [aou]rtar
SFX A r va/JPR [aou]rŧar
SFX A r va/JPR [ar]naliđar
SFX A r va/JPR [aux]nar
SFX A r va/JPR [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A r va/JPR [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A r va/JPR [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A r va/JPR [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A r va/JPR [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A r va/JPR [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A r va/JPR [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A r va/JPR [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A r va/JPR [bdfmnptvx]iar
SFX A r va/JPR [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A r va/JPR [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A r va/JPR [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A r va/JPR [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A r va/JPR [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A r va/JPR [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A r va/JPR [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A r va/JPR [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A r va/JPR [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A r va/JPR [blnrt]uir
SFX A r va/JPR [blprsvx]ear
SFX A r va/JPR [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A r va/JPR [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A r va/JPR [bou]rogar
SFX A r va/JPR [bp]erlar
SFX A r va/JPR [btv]ergar
SFX A r va/JPR [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A r va/JPR [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A r va/JPR [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A r va/JPR [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A r va/JPR [dg]obar
SFX A r va/JPR [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A r va/JPR [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A r va/JPR [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A r va/JPR [dltv]ernar
SFX A r va/JPR [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A r va/JPR [eilox]mar
SFX A r va/JPR [einoru]xar
SFX A r va/JPR [einosu]car
SFX A r va/JPR [eiu]xurar
SFX A r va/JPR [eo]liđar
SFX A r va/JPR [eo]ntiđar
SFX A r va/JPR [es]kotar
SFX A r va/JPR [es]ŧervelar
SFX A r va/JPR [fjkx]ermar
SFX A r va/JPR [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A r va/JPR [fm]eretar
SFX A r va/JPR [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A r va/JPR [fsx]ierir
SFX A r va/JPR [ft]erdir
SFX A r va/JPR [fŧ]etuar
SFX A r va/JPR [gin]ritar
SFX A r va/JPR [iln]trar
SFX A r va/JPR [inru]jar
SFX A r va/JPR [io]ntar
SFX A r va/JPR [io]rkolar
SFX A r va/JPR [ipt]ađar
SFX A r va/JPR [ipu]lar
SFX A r va/JPR [irst]umar
SFX A r va/JPR [klt]ivar
SFX A r va/JPR [kp]avejar
SFX A r va/JPR [kt]erŧar
SFX A r va/JPR [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A r va/JPR [ln]etrar
SFX A r va/JPR [lnoru]đar
SFX A r va/JPR [mp]eritar
SFX A r va/JPR [mv]ergolar
SFX A r va/JPR [nr]guir
SFX A r va/JPR [ns]erbar
SFX A r va/JPR [ns]ervar
SFX A r va/JPR [ns]kuercar
SFX A r va/JPR [nsv]edar
SFX A r va/JPR [nx]goŧar
SFX A r va/JPR [op]ar
SFX A r va/JPR [ox]longar
SFX A r va/JPR [pt]erveñir
SFX A r va/JPR [pt]resar
SFX A r va/JPR [pt]rotar
SFX A r va/JPR [stŧ]imentar
SFX A r va/JPR [sŧ]erkar
SFX A r va/JPR [tuv]iliđar
SFX A r va/JPR [tv]eriđar
SFX A r va/JPR [tv]erniđar
SFX A r va/JPR [xŧ]ertar
SFX A r va/JPR alar
SFX A r va/JPR alienar
SFX A r va/JPR amar
SFX A r va/JPR arar
SFX A r va/JPR arveñir
SFX A r va/JPR aver
SFX A r va/JPR bersajar
SFX A r va/JPR bertonar
SFX A r va/JPR bordeđar
SFX A r va/JPR dar
SFX A r va/JPR deramar
SFX A r va/JPR derenar
SFX A r va/JPR derivar
SFX A r va/JPR derobar
SFX A r va/JPR derokar
SFX A r va/JPR derokir
SFX A r va/JPR derotar
SFX A r va/JPR desavir
SFX A r va/JPR desferenŧiar
SFX A r va/JPR devorar
SFX A r va/JPR devorŧiar
SFX A r va/JPR dexeredar
SFX A r va/JPR dexverxenar
SFX A r va/JPR dir
SFX A r va/JPR donar
SFX A r va/JPR exerŧitar
SFX A r va/JPR far
SFX A r va/JPR fermentar
SFX A r va/JPR fumar
SFX A r va/JPR griliar
SFX A r va/JPR guernar
SFX A r va/JPR inbaretar
SFX A r va/JPR infervorar
SFX A r va/JPR inkartonar
SFX A r va/JPR intarsiar
SFX A r va/JPR interesar
SFX A r va/JPR interiŧir
SFX A r va/JPR interkalar
SFX A r va/JPR interkuerar
SFX A r va/JPR interkuirar
SFX A r va/JPR interlinear
SFX A r va/JPR interlokuir
SFX A r va/JPR intermeđar
SFX A r va/JPR interogar
SFX A r va/JPR interpretar
SFX A r va/JPR intiriŧir
SFX A r va/JPR inveriar
SFX A r va/JPR inversiar
SFX A r va/JPR inŧercelar
SFX A r va/JPR kalar
SFX A r va/JPR kalefar
SFX A r va/JPR kantar
SFX A r va/JPR karpir
SFX A r va/JPR kolar
SFX A r va/JPR korniđar
SFX A r va/JPR koñer
SFX A r va/JPR kriolar
SFX A r va/JPR kurvar
SFX A r va/JPR lotar
SFX A r va/JPR lumar
SFX A r va/JPR lustrar
SFX A r va/JPR maravejar
SFX A r va/JPR menar
SFX A r va/JPR meravejar
SFX A r va/JPR merkantar
SFX A r va/JPR merkantiđar
SFX A r va/JPR međar
SFX A r va/JPR mojar
SFX A r va/JPR mudarar
SFX A r va/JPR ojar
SFX A r va/JPR okar
SFX A r va/JPR ormeđar
SFX A r va/JPR parer
SFX A r va/JPR perdonar
SFX A r va/JPR perfumar
SFX A r va/JPR perifraxar
SFX A r va/JPR periodar
SFX A r va/JPR perkolar
SFX A r va/JPR perkotar
SFX A r va/JPR perletar
SFX A r va/JPR perlustrar
SFX A r va/JPR permaner
SFX A r va/JPR permudarar
SFX A r va/JPR permutar
SFX A r va/JPR perorar
SFX A r va/JPR perpetrar
SFX A r va/JPR perpetuar
SFX A r va/JPR perseguir
SFX A r va/JPR perseguitar
SFX A r va/JPR personaliđar
SFX A r va/JPR persugar
SFX A r va/JPR pertegar
SFX A r va/JPR pervertir
SFX A r va/JPR poder
SFX A r va/JPR pongar
SFX A r va/JPR rajar
SFX A r va/JPR ramar
SFX A r va/JPR raxar
SFX A r va/JPR redar
SFX A r va/JPR remaner
SFX A r va/JPR rigolar
SFX A r va/JPR rivar
SFX A r va/JPR robar
SFX A r va/JPR roersar
SFX A r va/JPR rokir
SFX A r va/JPR rolar
SFX A r va/JPR sajar
SFX A r va/JPR saver
SFX A r va/JPR scantiđar
SFX A r va/JPR seguir
SFX A r va/JPR seguitar
SFX A r va/JPR serajar
SFX A r va/JPR servir
SFX A r va/JPR siar
SFX A r va/JPR skortegar
SFX A r va/JPR sotolinear
SFX A r va/JPR soverkiar
SFX A r va/JPR spergoŧar
SFX A r va/JPR sperimentar
SFX A r va/JPR sperlongar
SFX A r va/JPR spernacar
SFX A r va/JPR speronar
SFX A r va/JPR sperđurar
SFX A r va/JPR steriliđar
SFX A r va/JPR sugar
SFX A r va/JPR superbir
SFX A r va/JPR terapienar
SFX A r va/JPR teraŧar
SFX A r va/JPR termenar
SFX A r va/JPR terminar
SFX A r va/JPR terŧariolar
SFX A r va/JPR teñir
SFX A r va/JPR tonar
SFX A r va/JPR tormentar
SFX A r va/JPR tuar
SFX A r va/JPR vejar
SFX A r va/JPR velar
SFX A r va/JPR verdeđar
SFX A r va/JPR vergiđar
SFX A r va/JPR vergoñar
SFX A r va/JPR verifegar
SFX A r va/JPR verigolar
SFX A r va/JPR verolar
SFX A r va/JPR versar
SFX A r va/JPR vertir
SFX A r va/JPR verxurar
SFX A r va/JPR verđelar
SFX A r va/JPR veñir
SFX A r va/JPR xberlefar
SFX A r va/JPR xberlotar
SFX A r va/JPR xberlumar
SFX A r va/JPR xberxelar
SFX A r va/JPR xeguir
SFX A r va/JPR xelar
SFX A r va/JPR xermojar
SFX A r va/JPR xgoñar
SFX A r va/JPR xlargiđar
SFX A r va/JPR xmerdar
SFX A r va/JPR xmerejar
SFX A r va/JPR xmeriliar
SFX A r va/JPR xmerŧiar
SFX A r va/JPR xmorgolar
SFX A r va/JPR xnervađar
SFX A r va/JPR xvergoñaŧar
SFX A r va/JPR đurar
SFX A r va/JPR ŧercar
SFX A r va/JPR ŧernir
SFX A r va/JPR ŧerpir
SFX A r va/JPR ŧirkuir
SFX A r va/JPR ŧitar
SFX A r va/JPR ŧokir
SFX A r vau/Q [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A r vau/Q [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A r vau/Q [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A r vau/Q [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A r vau/Q [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A r vau/Q [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A r vau/Q [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A r vau/Q [abdfgikmst]urar
