public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
adintar/A
realdir/A
dexinamorar/A
arar/A
armiđar/A
atergar/A
autorar/A
reavar/A
inbagolar/A
trabalar/A
xbalinar/A
rexbalŧar/A
xbandonar/A
baratar/A
barikar/A
bastar/A
rebatiđar/A
xbavar/A
bekar/A
inbendar/A
betegar/A
xbiankir/A
xbigolar/A
xbiñar/A
bivakar/A
bójer/A
dexbokar/A
inboloñar/A
bonaŧar/A
borir/A
dexborsar/A
xbotegar/A
dexboxemar/A
xbrajar/A
dexbratar/A
xbrefelar/A
xbrindolar/A
dexbrojar/A
brondolar/A
brustolar/A
inbugar/A
inbutirar/A
cacarar/A
scarir/A
cekolar/A
soscèñer/A
cetar/A
descodar/A
scupar/A
dameɉar/A
dekiarar/A
deskalsar/A
diamantar/A
indíxer/A
doloxar/A
donar/A
dexdorar/A
doxar/A
durar/A
inđalir/A
ađónxer/A
đugolar/A
eklisar/A
subentrar/A
estenuar/A
exekrar/A
kontrafar/A
desfabrikar/A
defalkar/A
fanfruñar/A
sfarinar/A
faŧendar/A
skarnifegar/A
sakrifegar/A
defenir/A
inferir/A
festeđar/A
enfiar/A
desfiapir/A
konfidar/A
refikar/A
finir/A
fiondar/A
fiscar/A
fluir/A
infogar/A
sfoɉar/A
straforar/A
reformar/A
formigolar/A
infosar/A
franar/A
infrànđer/A
sfratar/A
desfredir/A
sfrexar/A
sfritegar/A
frular/A
transfugar/A
fumegar/A
futuriđar/A
xgabanar/A
ingaletar/A
dexganasar/A
inganŧar/A
ingarbujar/A
garxar/A
ingaxetar/A
xgiñaŧar/A
xgomentar/A
xgorbar/A
degradar/A
ingramir/A
dexgranelar/A
dexgrasar/A
dexgravar/A
gređar/A
ingretolir/A
ingrinŧar/A
ingriŧolir/A
ingropar/A
xgruñar/A
gualivar/A
guidar/A
ingurxitar/A
idratar/A
indavalkar/A
infornar/A
inpiokar/A
insir/A
intimar/A
inxuriar/A
ixolar/A
xɉanŧar/A
inɉemar/A
ɉoŧar/A
ɉustar/A
inkaecar/A
rinkagar/A
kaligar/A
kalmar/A
deskalŧar/A
inkamufar/A
kanbiar/A
inkanevar/A
skanpar/A
inkantonar/A
inkapar/A
kapocar/A
karatar/A
karenar/A
karnevalar/A
kartar/A
deskartoŧar/A
rekaskar/A
skatarar/A
kativar/A
kaŧar/A
rekavar/A
deskavedar/A
skekeđar/A
inkoatar/A
kojonbarar/A
deskolar/A
kolmar/A
rekoltar/A
komodar/A
koncar/A
inkonkar/A
konpasar/A
kontar/A
kontiđar/A
skonŧar/A
kopiar/A
skórer/A
deskonkordar/A
inkordelar/A
eskorporar/A
inkosar/A
skotolar/A
rekovèrđer/A
krekolar/A
kreventar/A
kroar/A
krostenar/A
deskroxar/A
skuadronar/A
inkucar/A
kuerelar/A
inkuixir/A
skulaŧar/A
kupar/A
kustionar/A
rekúxer/A
languir/A
laoratar/A
xlargiđar/A
xlaŧar/A
ledamar/A
lekar/A
xlepar/A
alevar/A
libar/A
ligar/A
limitar/A
lisegar/A
traxlokar/A
prolongar/A
aloŧar/A
iluminar/A
macar/A
malgamar/A
manestrar/A
xmañaŧar/A
marɉar/A
xmaskarar/A
stramaŧar/A
intermeđar/A
emendar/A
merkantiđar/A
preméter/A
diminuir/A
mòjer/A
amonir/A
mónxer/A
inmorsar/A
mòver/A
mufir/A
mustaxar/A
xnaređar/A
renegar/A
ninolar/A
notiŧiar/A
xñinfar/A
ojar/A
ondeđar/A
orbegar/A
ortigar/A
pacarar/A
despajar/A
paleŧar/A
pancanar/A
papuŧar/A
sparecar/A
partiŧionar/A
despastar/A
repatriar/A
spaveɉar/A
apelar/A
pénder/A
pensar/A
straperdonar/A
peskar/A
petenar/A
pexar/A
pianiđar/A
spikar/A
piòver/A
pispolar/A
platinar/A
inpolpar/A
despóner/A
sponcar/A
pontolar/A
strasportar/A
potacar/A
prèmer/A
prexentar/A
inprontar/A
inpuñar/A
rabir/A
iraixar/A
ranpegar/A
raskiar/A
reklutar/A
reñar/A
xridakiar/A
derobar/A
irokar/A
rónper/A
roversar/A
ruimar/A
saer/A
sakosar/A
arsaltar/A
saonar/A
desavir/A
scopetar/A
rasekurar/A
seguitar/A
inselvadigir/A
konsentir/A
inserajar/A
asetar/A
rekonsiderar/A
sinkopar/A
sixolar/A
skarabotar/A
iskeletrar/A
skoar/A
skriŧolar/A
skuriar/A
insolentar/A
sonakiar/A
sòrxer/A
spàrxer/A
speronar/A
spianŧar/A
ispiritar/A
springar/A
star/A
restabilir/A
stankeđar/A
instekir/A
estirpar/A
destokar/A
stralar/A
strigar/A
dexostruir/A
studiar/A
sufragar/A
insurir/A
tabular/A
atakar/A
tanbuxar/A
taređar/A
tavanar/A
esténder/A
tenpestar/A
retentar/A
reteñir/A
téñer/A
terar/A
atestar/A
destirar/A
tokar/A
stondar/A
torkolar/A
destòrđer/A
astràer/A
trakeɉar/A
trasinar/A
destraviar/A
intresar/A
trionfar/A
trotolar/A
intuɉar/A
ŧapegar/A
ŧelebrar/A
inŧeregar/A
ŧexelar/A
ŧinganar/A
ŧiviliđar/A
ŧupegar/A
ustar/A
vageɉar/A
xvanpolar/A
stravaxar/A
xvegrar/A
xvenar/A
venturar/A
soveñir/A
skonvèñer/A
xvergoñaŧar/A
pervertir/A
xvestir/A
vilir/A
viscar/A
avixar/A
voler/A
revoltolar/A
vulnerar/A
xbabaŧar/A
xelar/A
xermojar/A
xlankar/A
xudegar/A
